District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0655.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Protecting Judicial Privacy Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
(1) “Government agency" means any agency, employee, or instrumentality of the
District government.
(2) "Home address" includes a judicial officer's permanent residence and any
secondary residences affirmatively identified by the judicial officer, but does not include a
judicial officer's work address.
(3) "Immediate family" includes a judicial officer's spouse, child, parent, or any
blood relative of the judicial officer or the judicial officer's spouse who lives in the same
household as the judicial officer.
(4) "Judicial officer" includes actively employed or retired:
(A) Justices of the United States Supreme Court;
(B) Judges of the United States Court of Appeals;


(C) Judges and magistrate judges of the United States District Court;
(D) Judges of the United States Bankruptcy Court;
(E) Judges of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals; and
(F) Judges and magistrate judges of the Superior Court of the District of
Columbia.
(5) "Personal information" means a home address, home telephone number,
mobile telephone number, pager number, personal email address, social security number, federal
tax identification number, checking and savings account numbers, credit card numbers, marital
status, and identity of children under the age of 18.
(6) "Publicly available content" means any written, printed, or electronic
document or record that provides information or that serves as a document or record maintained,
controlled, or in the possession of a government agency that may be obtained by any person or
entity, from the Internet, from the government agency upon request either free of charge or for a
fee, or in response to a request under the Freedom of Information Act.
(7) "Publicly display" means to communicate to another or otherwise make
available to the general public, including through publication on the internet and social media
applications.
(8) "Written request" means written notice signed by a judicial officer or a
representative of the judicial officer's employer requesting a government agency, person,
business, or association to refrain from posting or displaying publicly available content that
includes the judicial officer's personal information.
Sec 3. Prohibition on publicly displaying a judicial officer's personal information by
government agencies.


(a) A government agency shall not publicly display publicly available content that
includes a judicial officer's personal information, provided that the government agency has
received a written request in accordance with this act that it refrain from disclosing the judicial
officer's personal information.
(b) After a government agency has received a written request, that agency shall remove
the judicial officer's personal information from publicly available content within 5 business days.
After the government agency has removed the judicial officer's personal information from
publicly available content, the agency shall not publicly post or display the information and the
judicial officer's personal information shall be exempt from the Freedom of Information Act
unless the government agency has received consent from the judicial officer to make the personal
information available to the public.
(c) If a government agency fails to comply with a written request to refrain from
disclosing personal information, the judicial officer may bring an action seeking injunctive or
declaratory relief in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.
Sec. 4. Prohibition on publicly displaying a judicial officer's personal information on the
Internet by persons, businesses, associations or other private organizations.
(a)(1) No person, business, association or other private organization shall publicly post or
display on the Internet, including but not limited to, Internet phone directories, Internet search
engines, Internet data aggregators, and Internet service providers, publicly available content that
includes a judicial officer's personal information, provided that the judicial officer has made a
written request to the person, business, association or other private organization that it refrain
from disclosing the personal information.


(2) No person, business, association, or other private organization shall solicit,
sell, or trade on the Internet, including but not limited to, Internet phone directories, Internet
search engines, Internet data aggregators, and Internet service providers, a judicial officer's
personal information with the intent to pose an imminent and serious threat to the health and
safety of the judicial officer or the judicial officer's immediate family.
(b) After a person, business, association, or other private organization has received a
written request from a judicial officer to protect the privacy of the officer's personal information,
that person, business, association, or other private organization shall have 48 hours to remove the
personal information from the Internet.
(c) After a person, business, association, or other private organization has received a
written request from a judicial officer, that person, business, association, or other private
organization shall ensure that the judicial officer's personal information is not made available on
any website or subsidiary website controlled by that person, business, association, or other
private organization.
(d) After receiving a judicial officer's written request, no person, business, association, or
other private organization shall transfer the judicial officer's personal information to any other
person, business, association, or other private organization through any medium.
(e) A judicial officer whose personal information is made public as a result of a violation
of this act may bring an action seeking injunctive or declaratory relief in the Superior Court of
the District of Columbia. If the Court grants injunctive or declaratory relief, the person, business,
association, or other private organization responsible for the violation shall be required to pay the
judicial officer's costs and reasonable attorney's fees.


Sec. 5. Written request requirement.
100 (a) No government agency, person, business, association, or other private organization
101 shall be found to have violated any provision of this act if the judicial officer fails to submit a
102 written request calling for the protection of the judicial officer's personal information.
103 (b) A written request shall be valid if:
104 (1) The judicial officer sends a written request directly to the government agency,
105 person, business, association, or other private organization; or
106 (2) If the Mayor establishes a policy and procedure for a judicial officer to file the
107 written request with the Mayor to notify government agencies, the judicial officer may send the
108 written request to the Mayor.
109 (A) Each year, the Mayor shall provide the Council with information on
110 the number of judicial officers who have submitted a written request to the Mayor under this act.
111 (c) A representative from the judicial officer's employer may submit a written request on
112 the judicial officer's behalf, provided that:
113 (1) The judicial officer gives written consent to the representative; and
114 (2) The representative agrees to furnish a copy of that consent when a written
115 request is made. The representative shall submit the written request as provided in subsection (b)
116 of this section.
117 (d)(1) A judicial officer's written request shall specify what personal information shall be
118 maintained private.
119 (2) If a judicial officer wishes to identify a secondary residence as a home address
120 as that term is defined in this act, the designation shall be made in the written request.
121


122 (3) A judicial officer shall disclose the identity of the officer's immediate family
123 and indicate that the personal information of these family members shall also be excluded to the
124 extent that it could reasonably be expected to reveal the personal information of the judicial
125 officer.
126 (e) A judicial officer's written request is valid until the judicial officer provides the
127 government agency, person, business, association, or other private organization with written
128 permission to release the private information.
129 (f) A judicial officer's written request expires on death.
130 Sec. 6. Fiscal impact statement.
131 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
132 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
133 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
134 Sec. 7. Effective date.
135 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
136 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of congressional review
137 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
138 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
139